Massachusetts, session 194th, H3346.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a)(1) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital
asset management and maintenance may convey certain parcels of land to the town of Bolton.
The parcels to be conveyed formerly served as part of the campus of the Lancaster Industrial
School for Girls and are described as: (i) the Northeast corner of the former Lancaster Industrial
School for Girls, located at 220 Old Common road in the town of Lancaster, that extends into the
town of Bolton on a plan of land entitled “Lancaster Complex South Bolton & Old Common
Roads Lancaster & Bolton, Massachusetts”, prepared by Design Professionals, Inc. and dated
November 2, 2018 which is on file with the division of capital asset management and
maintenance; and (ii) the Bolton dam in the town of Bolton, located near the Lancaster town line,
as shown on 2 maps on file with the division of capital asset management and maintenance. The
of 4

parcels are further described in deeds recorded in the Worcester district registry of deeds in: (i)
book 639, page 254; (ii) book 639, page 255; (iii) book 549, page 192; (iv) book 549, page 194;
and (v) book 2642, page 485. The exact location and boundaries of the parcels to be conveyed
shall be determined by the commissioner after completion of a survey.
(2) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the town of Bolton, acting
by and through its select board, may enter into a purchase and sale agreement, lease or other
agreement to acquire the parcels or acquire rights to the parcels described in paragraph(1).
(3) The uses of the parcels described in paragraph(1) shall be restricted to general
municipal purposes. The deed or other instrument conveying a parcel to the town of Bolton
pursuant to this act shall state that the parcel shall be used solely for general municipal purposes
and shall include a reversionary clause that stipulates that if the parcels cease at any time to be
used for such purposes, then title to the parcel shall, at the election of the commonwealth, revert
to the commonwealth. The reversionary clause shall contain provisions requiring that the town of
Bolton receive reasonable notice of and a reasonable time to cure any allegation that either parcel
is not being used for general municipal purposes.
(4) The consideration for the conveyance shall be the fair market value of the parcels as
determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance based upon an
independent professional appraisal, taking into consideration the restriction on the use of
the parcels pursuant to paragraph (2). The commissioner shall submit the appraisal to the
inspector general for review and comment. The inspector general shall review and approve the
appraisal and the review shall include an examination of the methodology utilized for the
appraisal. The inspector general shall prepare a report and file the report with the commissioner
of 4

of capital asset management and maintenance. After receiving the report, the commissioner shall
submit copies of the report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint
committee on state administration and regulatory oversight not less than 15 days prior to the
execution of documents affecting the conveyance pursuant to this act.
(b)(1) If the town of Bolton does not complete the purchase of the parcels pursuant to
subsection (a) on or before December 31, 2025 or such date thereafter as agreed to by the town
of Bolton and the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, then,
notwithstanding sections 33 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital asset management and
maintenance may sell, lease for a term of up to 99 years, including all renewals and extensions,
or otherwise grant, convey or transfer to purchasers or lessees an interest in the parcels, or any
portions thereof on such other terms and conditions as the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance considers appropriate.
(2) The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance shall use appropriate
competitive bidding processes and procedures when making any disposition pursuant to this
section. Not less than 30 days before the date on which bids, proposals or other offers to
purchase the parcels, or any portion thereof, are due, the commissioner of capital asset
management and maintenance shall place a notice in the central register published by the state
secretary pursuant to section 20A of chapter 9 of the General Laws stating: (i) the availability of
the parcels; (ii) the nature of the competitive bidding process; (iii) the time, place and manner for
the submission of bids and proposals and the opening of the bids or proposals; and (iv) any other
information that the commissioner deems relevant. The commissioner shall place notice in the
of 4

central register of the individual or firm selected as party to any real property transaction
involving the property and the amount of the transaction.
(c) Any purchase and sale agreement, lease or other document relating to the sale, lease,
transfer or other disposition of the parcels, or any portions thereof, pursuant to this section shall
provide that the commonwealth shall have no liability to any purchaser, lessee, transferee or
successor to any purchaser, lessee or transferee of all or part of the parcels for any claims arising
out of or related to the conditions, known or unknown, of the parcels or otherwise in connection
with any sale, lease, transfer or other disposition thereof.
(d) A deed executed pursuant to this section may retain or grant rights of way or
easements for access, egress, utilities and drainage across any other portions of the parcels and
the commonwealth may accept from a purchaser rights of way or easements in roadways or
across any portions of the parcels to be conveyed or transferred for access, egress, drainage and
utilities as the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance may determine
necessary and appropriate to carry out this section.
(e) The purchaser or lessees of the parcels or portions thereof pursuant to subsection (b)
shall be responsible for all costs and expenses related to the purchase, lease or transfer of such
parcels including, but not limited to, costs associated with surveys, deed preparation and
recording fees as determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance.
(f) The cash proceeds of the sale of the parcels described in this section, or any portion
thereof, shall be deposited into the General Fund.
of 4